Utah statutes.
52-4-210.   Electronic message transmissions.

Nothing in this chapter shall be construed to restrict a member of a public body from transmitting an electronic message to other members of the public body at a time when the public body is not convened in an open meeting.



Enacted by Chapter 25, 2011 General Session

